Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,282
Adulteration of food; prohibited; adulteration, defined; deceptive trade practice.

(1) No person shall adulterate any food or manufacture, produce, import, distribute, promote, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sell any adulterated food.

(2) Food shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

(a) It bears or contains any substance which may render it injurious to health, considering the quantity of such substance in or on the food;

(b) It consists in whole or in part of any diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or is otherwise unsafe for use as food;

(c) It has been manufactured, processed, packaged, stored, or held under insanitary conditions where it may have become unsafe for use as food;

(d) It is the product of a diseased animal or one that has died by any means other than slaughter;

(e) It is a cultivated-protein food product;

(f) Its container is so constructed as to render the food unsafe or otherwise injurious to health; or

(g) Any valuable constituent of the food has been wholly or partially omitted or abstracted.

(3)(a) Any violation of this section that is committed in the course of business, vocation, or occupation shall, additionally and separately, constitute a deceptive trade practice.

(b) This section shall not be construed to affect the liability for any action that violates the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.28;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 51;

Laws 2025, LB246, § 4.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.